Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB746.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 246.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Commissioner shall be the head of the department. He or she shall keep his or
her office at the seat of government and devote his or her entire time to the duties
of his or her office.
(2) The Commissioner may employ necessary personnel to assist in carrying out his or
her duties.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:57 PM Jacketed